Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 34A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Brand. new text end new text begin "Brand" means a name, symbol, word, or mark that identifies a product and attributes the product to the product's brand owner. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 34A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1b. new text end new text begin Brand owner. new text end new text begin "Brand owner" means a person that owns or licenses a brand or that otherwise has rights to market a product under the brand, regardless of whether the brand's trademark is registered. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 34A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4a. new text end new text begin Food manufacturer. new text end new text begin "Food manufacturer" means a person who manufactures a packaged food product or whose brand name is affixed to a packaged food product. In the case of a packaged food product imported into the United States, food manufacturer includes the importer or first domestic distributor of the product if the person who manufactured or assembled the product or whose brand name is affixed to the packaged food product does not have a presence in the United States. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 34A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8a. new text end new text begin Ortho-phthalates or phthalates. new text end new text begin "Ortho-phthalates" or "phthalates" means substances that are esters of phthalic acid. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 34A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8b. new text end new text begin Packaged food product. new text end new text begin "Packaged food product" means any food product that is completely or partially enclosed in packaging materials. Packaged food product does not include meat, deli cheese, bakery products, and produce that is made or packaged at a retail location. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 34A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Universal product code or UPC. new text end new text begin "Universal product code" or "UPC" means a 12-digit number assigned to merchandise, including packaged food or packaged food products. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 34A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin UPC barcode. new text end new text begin "UPC barcode" means the machine-readable version of a universal product code. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [34A.025] ORTHO-PHTHALATE TESTING OF PACKAGED FOOD PRODUCTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Testing; notice to the commissioner. new text end new text begin (a) No later than 30 days before offering a packaged food product for sale in the state or distributing a packaged food product in the state, a food manufacturer or brand owner must test the packaged food product for levels of ortho-phthalates and must submit to the commissioner a written notice that includes: new text end new text begin (1) the name and a description of the packaged food product; new text end new text begin (2) the UPC barcode of the packaged food product and any UPC barcodes grouped under the packaged food product tested if the packaged food product is packaged in multiple sizes; new text end new text begin (3) the date that the packaged food product was tested for ortho-phthalates; new text end new text begin (4) testing results indicating that no ortho-phthalates were detected in the packaged food product or, if an ortho-phthalate was detected in the packaged food product, a description of each ortho-phthalate that the packaged food product contains, including: new text end new text begin (i) the ortho-phthalate's chemical abstracts service registry number; new text end new text begin (ii) the ortho-phthalate's IUPAC name or chemical name; new text end new text begin (iii) the exact quantity of the ortho-phthalate that the packaged food product contains; and new text end new text begin (iv) the quantity of ortho-phthalate in one serving size of the packaged food product. new text end new text begin (5) the testing laboratory's name, address, and telephone number and the name, title, telephone number, and email address of the laboratory employee who certified the testing results; new text end new text begin (6) a description of the testing laboratory's method of testing the packaged food product for ortho-phthalates; new text end new text begin (7) the name and address of the food manufacturer or brand owner and the name, address, and telephone number of a contact person for the food manufacturer or brand owner; and new text end new text begin (8) any other information required by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) A food manufacturer or brand owner that is selling or distributing a packaged food product in the state on the effective date of this act has until .... to submit a notice according to this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Laboratory accreditation. new text end new text begin The laboratory that a food manufacturer or brand owner uses for ortho-phthalate testing of packaged food products must be accredited according to the standards of the International Organization for Standardization (ISO)/International Electrotechnical Commission (IEC) 17025:2017 General Requirements for the Competence of Testing and Calibration Laboratories (November 30, 2017). new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Testing frequency. new text end new text begin A food manufacturer or brand owner that sells or distributes a packaged food product in the state must test packaged food products for ortho-phthalate levels every two years and submit a written notice to the commissioner of agriculture according to subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Publishing of testing results. new text end new text begin A food manufacturer or brand owner that sells or distributes a packaged food product in the state must make testing results of all packaged food products publicly available by posting the results on the food manufacturer's or brand owner's website. The website must be easily found by a consumer and must include: new text end new text begin (1) the name of the packaged food product; new text end new text begin (2) the UPC barcode of the packaged food product and any UPC barcodes grouped under the packaged food product tested if the packaged food product is packaged in multiple sizes; new text end new text begin (3) the date that the packaged food product was tested for ortho-phthalates; new text end new text begin (4) testing results indicating that no ortho-phthalates were detected in the packaged food product or, if an ortho-phthalate was detected in the packaged food product, a description of each ortho-phthalate that the packaged food product contains, including: new text end new text begin (i) the ortho-phthalate's chemical abstracts service registry number; new text end new text begin (ii) the ortho-phthalate's IUPAC name or chemical name; new text end new text begin (iii) the exact quantity of the ortho-phthalate that the packaged food product contains; and new text end new text begin (iv) the quantity of ortho-phthalate in one serving size of the packaged food product. new text end new text begin (5) the testing laboratory's name, address, and telephone number and the name, title, telephone number, and email address of the laboratory employee who certified the testing results; new text end new text begin (6) a description of the testing laboratory's method of testing the packaged food product for ortho-phthalates; new text end new text begin (7) the name and address of the food manufacturer or brand owner and the name, address, and telephone number of an employee of the food manufacturer or brand owner who answers consumer questions about testing results; and new text end new text begin (8) any other information required by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Labeling. new text end new text begin A food manufacturer or brand owner that sells or distributes a packaged food product in the state must include: (1) a QR code or other machine-readable code that links to a page on the food manufacturer's or brand owner's website that contains the packaged food product's testing results for ortho-phthalates; and (2) a statement that reads, "For information about ortho-phthalate testing of this product, scan the QR code." new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin If the commissioner of agriculture finds that a food manufacturer or brand owner has violated this section, the commissioner must enforce this section by taking administrative actions under section 34A.06 or imposing administrative penalties under section 34A.07. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end